Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for the developing markets for continuous-living cover crops program. By February 1, 2026, and February 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy detailing uses of money under this section, including administrative costs, and the achievements to which the money contributed. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end